zh-TW: 數字油畫表面類型: 畫布 (繃框); 畫布板; 畫布面板; 卡紙; 布料/紡織品; MDF 板; 紙張; 塑膠; 木板; 其他
hu: Számfestő felülettípusa: Vászon (feszített); Kasírozott vászon; Vászon panel; Karton; Szövet/Textil; MDF lap; Papír; Műanyag; Fa panel; Egyéb
ru: Тип поверхности для рисования по номерам: Холст (на подрамнике); Холст на картоне; Холст на панели; Картон; Ткань/текстиль; Панель МДФ; Бумага; Пластик; Деревянная панель; Другое
el: Τύπος επιφάνειας βαφής με αριθμό: Καμβάς (τεντωμένος); Πίνακας καμβά; Πάνελ καμβά; Χαρτόνι; Ύφασμα; Επιφάνεια MDF; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Ξύλινο πάνελ; Άλλο
ja: 数字で塗り絵をするタイプの表面: キャンバス (張り); キャンバスボード; キャンバスパネル; カードストック; 生地/テキスタイル; MDFボード; 紙; プラスチック; ウッドパネル; その他
fr: Type de support de peinture par numéros: Toile (tendue); Carton entoilé; Panneau entoilé; Papier cartonné; Tissu/textile; Panneau MDF; Papier; Plastique; Panneau en bois; Autre
ko: 숫자 색칠 표면 유형: 캔버스(스트레치); 캔버스 보드; 캔버스 패널; 카드스톡; 직물/텍스타일; MDF 보드; 종이; 플라스틱; 나무 패널; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de suprafață pentru pictură pe numere: Pânză (întinsă); Placă de pânză; Panou de pânză; Carton; Material/Textil; Placă MDF; Hârtie; Plastic; Panou de lemn; Altele
es: Tipo de superficie para pintar por números: Lienzo (tensado); Cartón entelado; Panel de lienzo; Cartulina; Tela/textil; Tablero de MDF; Papel; Plástico; Panel de madera; Otro
pl: Typ powierzchni do malowania po numerach: Płótno (naciągnięte); Podobrazie płytowe; Podobrazie panelowe; Brystol; Tkanina/Materiał; Płyta MDF; Papier; Plastik; Panel drewniany; Inne
tr: Numaralı boyama yüzey tipi: Kanvas (gerilmiş); Kanvas pano; Kanvas panel; Karton; Kumaş/Tekstil; MDF pano; Kağıt; Plastik; Ahşap pano; Diğer
th: ประเภทพื้นผิวระบายสีตามหมายเลข: แคนวาส (ขึงเฟรม); แผ่นกระดานแคนวาส; แผ่นแคนวาส; กระดาษแข็ง; ผ้า/สิ่งทอ; กระดาน MDF; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; แผ่นไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 数字填色表面类型: 绷架帆布; 帆布板; 帆布画板; 卡纸; 织物/纺织品; 中密度纤维板; 纸张; 塑料; 木板; 其他
de: Oberflächentyp für Malen nach Zahlen: Leinwand (aufgespannt); Malkarton; Leinwandkarton; Kartonpapier; Stoff/Textil; MDF-Platte; Papier; Kunststoff; Holzplatte; Sonstige
fi: Numeromaalauspohjan tyyppi: Kanvas (pingotettu); Kanvaspahvi; Kanvaspaneeli; Kartonki; Kangas/tekstiili; MDF-levy; Paperi; Muovi; Puupaneeli; Muu
nl: Schilderen-op-nummer oppervlaktype: Canvas (gespannen); Canvasbord; Canvaspaneel; Karton; Stof/textiel; MDF-bord; Papier; Plastic; Houten paneel; Overig
da: Paint-by-number-overfladetype: Lærred (opspændt); Lærredsplade; Lærredspanel; Karton; Stof/tekstil; MDF-plade; Papir; Plastik; Træpanel; Andet
sv: Yttyp för målning efter nummer: Målarduk (uppspänd); Pannå; Dukpannå; Kraftigt papper; Tyg/textil; MDF-skiva; Papper; Plast; Träpanel; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ povrchu na maľovanie podľa čísel: Plátno (natiahnuté); Plátno na doske; Plátenný panel; Kartónový papier; Látka/textil; MDF doska; Papier; Plast; Drevený panel; Iné
pt-BR: Pintura por números tipo de superfície: Tela (esticada); Painel telado; Painel de tela; Cartolina; Tecido/têxtil; Chapa de MDF; Papel; Plástico; Painel de madeira; Outro
vi: Loại bề mặt tranh tô màu theo số: Canvas (căng sẵn); Bảng toan canvas; Tấm canvas; Giấy bìa; Vải/Hàng dệt may; Bảng MDF; Giấy; Nhựa; Bảng gỗ; Khác
lt-LT: Tapybos pagal numerius paviršiaus tipas: Drobė (įtempta); Drobės kartonas; Drobės skydelis; Kartonas; Audinys / tekstilė; MDF plokštė; Popierius; Plastikas; Medinė plokštė; Kita
it: Tipo di superficie del disegno numerato: Tela (intelaiata); Cartone telato; Pannello telato; Cartoncino; Tessuto; Pannello in MDF; Carta; Plastica; Pannello in legno; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta površine za slikanje po številkah: Platno (napeto); Platno na kartonu; Platno na plošči; Trši papir (kartonček); Tkanina/tekstil; Plošča MDF; Papir; Plastika; Lesena plošča; Drugo
cs: Typ povrchu pro malování podle čísla: Plátno (napnuté); Plátno na desce; Plátnový panel; Karton; Látka/textil; MDF deska; Papír; Plast; Dřevěný panel; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип повърхност за рисуване по номера: Платно (опънато); Платно на картон; Платно на панел; Картон; Тъкан/текстил; MDF плоскост; Хартия; Пластмаса; Дървен панел; Друго
hr-HR: Vrsta površine za bojanje po broju: Platno (napeto); Platno na kartonu; Platno na ploči; Tvrdi karton; Tkanina/tekstil; MDF ploča; Papir; Plastika; Drvena ploča; Ostalo
en: Paint-by-number surface type: Canvas (stretched); Canvas board; Canvas panel; Cardstock; Fabric/Textile; MDF board; Paper; Plastic; Wood panel; Other
nb: Overflatetype for maling etter nummer: Lerret (oppspent); Lerretplate; Lerretpanel; Kartong; Stoff/tekstil; MDF-plate; Papir; Plast; Trepanel; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de superfície para pintura por números: Tela (esticada); Cartão telado; Painel de tela; Cartolina; Tecido/têxtil; Placa em MDF; Papel; Plástico; Painel de madeira; Outro